Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1911.01
Fees.

(1) For a license to operate a program for fewer than thirty children, each applicant for a license and each licensee shall pay to the department, at the time of initial application and annually thereafter, a license fee of twenty-five dollars.

(2) For a license to operate a program for thirty or more children, each applicant for a license and each licensee shall pay to the department, at the time of initial application and annually thereafter, a license fee of fifty dollars.

(3) If the department denies an application for a license and has not completed an inspection prior to such denial, the department shall return the license fee to the applicant.

Laws 1993, LB 510, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 72.